New York, session 2025-2026, A1115.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 103 of the general municipal law, 2 as separately amended by section 5 of subpart A of part C of chapter 97 3 of the laws of 2011 and by chapter 608 of the laws of 2011, is amended 4 to read as follows: 5 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 6 any officer, board or agency of a political subdivision or of any 7 district therein authorized to make purchases of materials, equipment or 8 supplies, or to contract for services, may make such purchases, or may 9 contract for services, other than services subject to article nine of 10 the labor law, when available, through: (a) the county in which the 11 political subdivision or district is located; or [through] (b) any coun- 12 ty within the state subject to the rules established pursuant to subdi- 13 vision two of section four hundred eight-a of the county law; or (c) 14 another political subdivision or district of any county within the state 15 subject to the rules established pursuant to subdivision two of section 16 four hundred eight-a of the county law; provided that the political 17 subdivision or district for which such officer, board or agency acts 18 shall accept sole responsibility for any payment due the vendor or 19 contractor. All purchases and all contracts for such services shall be 20 subject to audit and inspection by the political subdivision or district 21 for which made. Prior to making such purchases or contracts the officer, 22 board or agency shall consider whether such contracts will result in 23 cost savings after all factors, including charges for service, material, 24 and delivery, have been considered. No officer, board or agency of a 25 political subdivision or of any district therein shall make any purchase EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01475-01-5 A. 1115 2 1 or contract for any such services through the county in which the poli- 2 tical subdivision or district is located or through any county within 3 the state when bids and offers have been received for such purchase or 4 such services by such officer, board or agency, unless such purchase may 5 be made or the contract for such services may be entered into upon the 6 same terms, conditions and specifications at a lower price through the 7 county. 8 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 103 of the general municipal law, as 9 amended by chapter 608 of the laws of 2011, is amended to read as 10 follows: 11 3. Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision one of this section, 12 any officer, board or agency of a political subdivision or of any 13 district therein authorized to make purchases of materials, equipment or 14 supplies, or to contract for services, may make such purchases, or may 15 contract for services, other than services subject to article eight or 16 nine of the labor law, when available[,]: (a) through the county in 17 which the political subdivision or district is located; or [through] (b) 18 any county within the state subject to the rules established pursuant to 19 subdivision two of section four hundred eight-a of the county law; or 20 (c) another political subdivision or district of any county within the 21 state subject to the rules established pursuant to subdivision two of 22 section four hundred eight-a of the county law; provided that the poli- 23 tical subdivision or district for which such officer, board or agency 24 acts shall accept sole responsibility for any payment due the vendor or 25 contractor. All purchases and all contracts for such services shall be 26 subject to audit and inspection by the political subdivision or district 27 for which made. Prior to making such purchases or contracts the officer, 28 board or agency shall consider whether such contracts will result in 29 cost savings after all factors, including charges for service, material, 30 and delivery, have been considered. No officer, board or agency of a 31 political subdivision or of any district therein shall make any purchase 32 or contract for any such services through the county in which the poli- 33 tical subdivision or district is located or through any county within 34 the state when bids and offers have been received for such purchase or 35 such services by such officer, board or agency, unless such purchase may 36 be made or the contract for such services may be entered into upon the 37 same terms, conditions and specifications at a lower price through the 38 county. 39 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately, provided that the amend- 40 ments to subdivision 3 of section 103 of the general municipal law made 41 by section one of this act shall be subject to the expiration and rever- 42 sion of such subdivision pursuant to section 9 of subpart A of part C of 43 chapter 97 of the laws of 2011, as amended, when upon such date the 44 provisions of section two of this act shall take effect.